North Carolina, session 2025, SB739.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Hyde County to be used to assist with the
purchase of property for oyster farming. The County shall collaborate with North Carolina
Marine Industrial Park Authority on this project.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S739-v-1*